Hawaii, session 2026, HB370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the amounts available to candidates in the State's partial public financing program were last significantly amended in 1995.  The legislature finds that since 1995-1996, the value of the dollar has risen to approximately $2.07. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Increase the amount of funds available to candidates who qualify to participate in the partial public financing program, including candidates for the board of trustees of the office of Hawaiian affairs, who run statewide; (2)  Encourage participation in the partial public financing program by providing for the adjustment of the amount of minimum qualifying contributions required for certain offices; (3)  Increase matching fund payments for excess qualifying contributions; and (4)  Appropriate funds from the general revenues of the State to increase the amount of funds available in the partial public financing program and to permit the campaign spending commission to hire more staff to address the anticipated increase in participation in the financing program. SECTION 2.  Section 11-423, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows: "(d)  From January 1 of the year of any primary, special, or general election, the aggregate expenditures for each election by a candidate who voluntarily agrees to limit campaign expenditures, inclusive of all expenditures made or authorized by the candidate alone, all treasurers, the candidate committee, and noncandidate committees on the candidate's behalf, shall not exceed the following amounts expressed, respectively multiplied by the number of voters in the last preceding general election registered to vote in each respective voting district: (1)  For the office of governor--[$2.50;] $3.00; (2)  For the office of lieutenant governor--[$1.40;] $1.68; (3)  For the office of mayor--[$2.00;] $2.40; (4)  For the offices of state senator, state representative, county council member, and prosecuting attorney--[$1.40;] $1.68; and (5)  For all other offices--[20] 24 cents." SECTION 3.  Section 11-425, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§11-425  Maximum amount of public funds available to candidate.  (a) The maximum amount of public funds available in each election to a candidate for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, [or] state senator, state representative, mayor, county council member, prosecuting attorney, or Hawaiian affairs shall not exceed [ten] sixty-seven per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election[.]; provided that the candidate shall not receive any public funds that, when combined with the candidate's qualifying contributions, are in excess of the expenditure limit. [(b)  The maximum amount of public funds available in each election to a candidate for the office of state senator, state representative, county council member, and prosecuting attorney shall not exceed fifteen per cent of the expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for each election. (c) For the office of Hawaiian affairs, the maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed $1,500 in any election year. (d)  For all other offices, the maximum amount of public funds available to a candidate shall not exceed $100 in any election year. (e)] (b)  Each candidate who qualified for the maximum amount of public funding in any primary election and who is a candidate for a subsequent general election shall apply with the commission to be qualified to receive the maximum amount of public funds as provided in this section for the respective general election. (c) For purposes of this section, "qualified" means meeting the qualifying campaign contribution requirements of section 11-429." SECTION 4.  Section 11-429, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  As a condition of receiving public funds for a primary or general election, a candidate shall not be unopposed in any election for which public funds are sought, shall have filed an affidavit with the commission pursuant to section 11‑423 to voluntarily limit the candidate's campaign expenditures, and shall be in receipt of the following sum of qualifying contributions from individual residents of Hawaii: (1)  For the office of governor--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $100,000; (2)  For the office of lieutenant governor--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000; (3)  For the office of mayor for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $15,000; (C)  County of Maui--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $10,000; and (D)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; (4)  For the office of prosecuting attorney for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$30,000;] $25,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$10,000;] $5,000; and (C)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$5,000;] $3,000; (5)  For the office of county council--for each respective county: (A)  County of Honolulu--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $5,000; (B)  County of Hawaii--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $1,500; (C)  County of Maui--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed [$5,000;] $4,000; and (D)  County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in the aggregate exceed $3,000; (6)  For the office of state senator--qualifying contributions that[,] in the aggregate exceed $2,500; (7)  For the office of state representative--qualifying contributions that[,] in the aggregate[,] exceed $1,500; (8)  For the office of Hawaiian affairs--qualifying contributions that[,] in the aggregate[,] exceed $1,500; and (9)  For all other offices[,]--qualifying contributions that[,] in the aggregate[,] exceed $500. (b)  A candidate shall obtain the minimum qualifying contribution amount set forth in subsection (a) once for the election period. [(1)] If the candidate obtains the minimum qualifying contribution amount, the candidate [is] shall be eligible to receive: [(A)] (1)  The minimum payment in an amount equal to the minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and [(B)] (2)  Payments of [$1] $2 for each $1 of qualifying contributions in excess of the minimum qualifying contribution amounts[; and]. [(2)] A candidate shall have at least one other qualified candidate as an opponent for the primary or general election to receive public funds for that election." SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to be deposited into the Hawaii election campaign fund. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the Hawaii election campaign fund the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for full-time equivalent (      FTE) permanent positions to be placed within the campaign spending commission. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign spending commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 8.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 9.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 10.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.